New York, session 2025-2026, S5360.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 599 of the labor law is amended by adding a new 2 subdivision 4 to read as follows: 3 4. Establishing eligible training programs and recruitment in the 4 healthcare field. (a) The commissioner, in consultation with the commis- 5 sioner of health, shall maintain a list of positions in the healthcare 6 field in which there are substantial staff shortages statewide and per 7 region of the state, that is updated at least once every calendar year. 8 Such list shall be established within sixty days of the effective date 9 of this subdivision and shall be published on the department's website. 10 (b) The commissioner, in consultation with the commissioner of health, 11 shall establish a program eligible under this section that provides 12 expedited training and certification processes for the healthcare posi- 13 tions on the list established pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subdivi- 14 sion that would be available to claimants eligible under this section. 15 The department shall make information about such program available on 16 its website. Such program shall be established within one hundred eighty 17 days of the effective date of this subdivision. 18 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD09523-01-5